Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1090
Salon owner; liability.

The owner of each salon shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the salon is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 89;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,128;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 352.